Washington statutes.
RCW 15.04.300

Guide to state and federal programs of assistance to farm families.

The department of agriculture is authorized to develop, in cooperation with Washington State University and other state agencies, an informational guide to programs offered by state and federal agencies which would be of assistance to farm families. The informational guide shall be made available to farmers and ranchers through county extension offices, farm organizations, and other appropriate means.

[ 1987 c 393 s 26.]